Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0515.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1e. (1) A landlord must install at least 1 operational carbon monoxide device in every rental unit that has a fuel-fired appliance that is provided or owned by the landlord or is adjacent to an enclosed garage. (2) A landlord that violates this section is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $500.00. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Carbon monoxide device" means a device that detects carbon monoxide, alerts occupants via a distinct and audible signal that is either self-contained in the unit or activated via a system connection, and is certified by a nationally recognized testing laboratory to conform to the latest standards of the underwriters laboratories standards. (b) "Fuel-fired appliance" means an appliance that burns a carbon-based fuel, including, but not limited to, gas, oil, coal, kerosene, biofuel, or wood. (c) "Operational" means working and in service.